Nevada, session 83, SB254.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 392 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Department shall, in consultation with
experts in education and mental and behavioral health of
children, develop, implement and disseminate a model policy
concerning screening for the behavioral, social and emotional
well-being of pupils. The policy must be based on a system of
support that progresses from universal screenings for all pupils to
individualized plans for specific pupils who need additional
behavioral, social or emotional support and must include, without
limitation:
(a) Processes for the implementation of the policy in schools
which must be based on evidence-based models relating to
universal screenings in schools;
(b) A variety of tools that are scientifically validated and
reliable for identifying the behavioral, social and emotional risk
factors for mental and behavioral health or substance use issues;
(c) Resources for training the staff of a school to ensure:
(1) Effective implementation of the policy;
(2) Proper interpretation of the results of any screening;
and
(3) That, where necessary, effective actions are taken after
a screening; and
(d) Guidelines for monitoring and evaluating the use and
effectiveness of the policy.
2. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils may choose to adopt the policy developed pursuant to
subsection 1. If the board of trustees or governing body adopts the
policy, the board of trustees or governing body may implement the
policy in the manner that is best suited for the school district,
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
based on the specific needs, priorities and resources of the school
district, charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. NRS 392.4601 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.4601 As used in NRS 392.4601 to 392.472, inclusive, and
section 2 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 392.4603, 392.4605 and 392.4607
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB254_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 5. Chapter 394 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 6 and 7 of this act.
Sec. 6. A private school may adopt the policy developed by
the Department pursuant to section 2 of this act and implement
the policy in the manner that is best suited for the private school
based on the specific needs, priorities and resources of the private
school.
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*SB254_R1*